Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 61
COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF DENVER

23-61-101 to 23-61-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 771, § 31, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 24 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.